California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(a) An advisory committee of 10 members shall be appointed to advise and consult with the department regarding the Community Challenge Grant Program in the following areas:

(1) The broad goals of the program.

(2) Effective strategies for implementing the program.

(3) Elements of evaluating the effectiveness of the program grantees.

(4) Strategies for engaging nongovernmental resources and expertise in the implementation and success of the program.

(b) Six members shall be appointed by the Secretary of California Health and Human Services, two members by the Speaker of the Assembly, and two members by the Senate Committee on Rules.

(c) The advisory committee shall reflect a broad constituency and multidisciplinary approach to the problem of teenage and unwed pregnancy, including persons that represent corporations and foundations, the religious community, parents, teenagers, the education and academic community, community-based organizations, and public health organizations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 227, Sec. 101.   (AB 1400)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

18993.4.

Grant applications shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(a) Plans for community collaboration with parents, local agencies, businesses, school leaders, community groups, and private organizations.

(b) Measurable objectives selected by the applicant.

(c) Evidence of the applicant’s capability to effect proposed changes.

(d) A needs assessment.

(e) A comprehensive description of the population or populations proposed to be served.

(f) A project description, a work plan, and budget justifications.

(g) A project evaluation and a process for data collection to facilitate the department’s ability to conduct a statewide evaluation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 197, Sec. 51.   Effective July 22, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

18993.5.

(a) Criteria for grant selection shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(1) Degree of community input and collaboration in the project.

(2) Degree of involvement of parents and families within the community.

(3) Degree of involvement of nongovernmental organizations.

(4) Degree of need for the project in the local community.

(5) Geographic, economic, population, and ethnic diversity.

(6) Feasibility.

(7) Cost effectiveness.

(8) Degree to which project outcomes can be measured and evaluated.

(b) The department shall provide an explanation for the reasons why an applicant is not funded.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 197, Sec. 51.   Effective July 22, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

18993.6.

(a) Grantees shall be required to match a portion of the grant awarded under the Community Challenge Grant Program with either dollar or measurable in-kind contributions as provided by this section.

(b) Grantees shall provide a match of not less than 10 percent for the first year of the grant, not less than 15 percent for the second year of the grant, and not less than 20 percent for the third year of the grant.

(c) The match required by this section shall be supplemental to the funds appropriated for the Community Challenge Grant Program and shall be from nongovernmental sources.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 197, Sec. 51.   Effective July 22, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

18993.7.

(a) The costs for state administration of the Community Challenge Grant Program may be up to 5 percent of the total appropriation for the program. The Legislature shall be notified of the administrative costs of this program pursuant to Section 28 of the Budget Act of 1996. Indirect costs for grantees shall not exceed 10 percent of the grant amount.

(b) The department may use local assistance funds allocated for the program to provide training to potential grantees authorized by subdivision (d) of Section 18993.2.

(c) The department may use local assistance funds allocated to the program for the evaluation of the program required by subdivision (b) of Section 18993.8.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 197, Sec. 51.   Effective July 22, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

18993.8.

The department shall conduct a statewide independent evaluation of the program, assessing the program’s effectiveness in achieving stated outcomes as established by the department. The evaluation shall be performed only when for this purpose funds are appropriated in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 728, Sec. 211.   (SB 71)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

18993.9.

The program provided for under this chapter shall be implemented only to the extent that funds are appropriated in the Budget Act.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 839, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 14.1. California Families and Children Home Visit Program [18994. - 18994.9.]

18994.

(a) This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the California Families and Children Home Visit Program.

(b) The department shall implement this chapter only to the extent that funds are appropriated for that purpose in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 329, Sec. 41.   Effective August 21, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

18994.1.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) About 26 percent of California’s children under the age of 18 years live in families with incomes below the federal poverty line, an increase of 56 percent since 1980. Poverty is associated with numerous problems, including low educational performance, poor nutrition, the mistreatment of children, and juvenile delinquency.

(b) State vital statistics data indicate that about 33 percent of California’s children were born out-of-wedlock in 1991, an increase of 61 percent since 1980. Growing up in a single parent household is associated with greater likelihood of living in poverty, higher school dropout rates, higher incidence of teenage pregnancy, and reduced levels of employment.

(c) Research has found that poor parenting practices and family stress can increase the incidence of child behavior problems in children as young as three years of age. These behavioral problems can affect a variety of children’s life outcomes including success in school and incidence of juvenile delinquency.

(d) Over one-fourth of California’s children speak a foreign language.

(e) California’s children are becoming more culturally and ethnically diverse.

(f) Recent findings in the area of brain development research indicate that inadequate parent-child interaction can negatively affect the cognitive development of children.

(g) High quality voluntary home visit programs have been shown to improve a variety of parental and child outcomes. Specifically, these outcomes include reductions in poor birth outcomes, reductions in the mistreatment of children, reductions of and greater spacing between pregnancies, reduced use of welfare, and increased amounts of parental employment. Studies show that low-income, single parents exhibit the largest improvements over the long run from these programs.

(h) Research also shows that home visit programs that address a broad array of family needs are more likely to improve life outcomes for families and children. Examples of improved life outcomes include reductions in the mistreatment of children, increased rates of school completion, reduced incidence of teenage pregnancy, reduced interaction with the juvenile justice system, and improved health.

(i) It is the intent of the Legislature, in enacting this chapter, to establish a high-quality voluntary home visiting program for at-risk families.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 329, Sec. 41.   Effective August 21, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

18994.2.

(a) “At risk” means families who experience multiple stress factors, and who are more likely than the general population to have adverse health, social, and economic outcomes.

(b) “Home visit” means a strategy of service delivery in which specially trained professional or paraprofessional personnel provide services in the client’s home. These personnel typically make contact with at-risk families during pregnancy or at childbirth and continue contact with the client in the parent’s home for between two and five years with the purpose of providing information and family support services.

(c) “Family support services” means any services intended to improve parent-child interaction, aid families to become more self-sufficient, or reduce family stress. These services include help with goal setting, information about parent-child interaction, information about and help in accessing other health and social services, and development of problem-solving skills.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 329, Sec. 41.   Effective August 21, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

18994.3.

(a) The Office of Child Abuse Prevention in the State Department of Social Services shall be responsible for award of implementation grants and continued operation of the California Families and Children Home Visit Program.

(b) Office of Child Abuse Prevention’s responsibilities include:

(1) Provision of technical assistance to local home visit programs.

(2) Evaluation and assessment of local programs with the objective of improving program results.

(3) Certification that local programs continue to meet standards determined by the agency to be important for successful positive life outcomes for clients. The Office of Child Abuse Prevention shall, when reviewing grant applications under this chapter, take into consideration geographical and population diversity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 329, Sec. 41.   Effective August 21, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

18994.4.

(a) Each county that chooses to participate in the California Families and Children Home Visit Program shall develop and submit to the Office of Child Abuse Prevention a three-year plan for phasing in a home visit program for eligible families.

(b) Each implementation plan shall include:

(1) The method of determining, and a description of the at-risk population served. Counties shall assess local community needs, and make modifications that are consistent with the California Safe and Healthy Families Model Program, or its successor.

(2) A clearly defined mission statement, and specific goals and objectives that are consistent with the mission statement.

(3) A proposed voluntary home visit service delivery model, incorporating the key components and standards of the California Safe and Healthy Families Model Program, or its successor. The essential components and standards of the California Safe and Healthy Families Program Model include:

(A) A comprehensive service array that includes, but is not limited to, systematic assessment, individualized family service planning, intensive home visiting, child health and development monitoring and intervention, center-based activities that serve parents, infants, and older siblings, linkage to health care and other community resources, and an on-going problem solving case coordination.

(B) Services provided by a multidisciplinary team, that includes appropriate supervision to home visitors and other team members, management of the caseload, and ensuring that service quality is maintained.

(C) Caseloads that are balanced in size, not to exceed 25 cases per home visitor, and intensity (service intensity varies with client need).

(D) On-going training and skill development.

(E) An approach to implementation that addresses relationships with existing service systems.

(4) A description of how home visit “best practices” are incorporated into a proposed model.

(5) A description of how the applicant proposes to coordinate and collaborate with other community service providers including community-based organizations, schools, religious organizations, community police, health care districts, and welfare and social service agencies.

(6) Provisions for families participating in the voluntary home visit program, to provide informed consent and to ensure the confidentiality of the records pertaining to the program.

(7) Specified quality assurance and improvement processes.

(8) Projected results by which positive outcomes and the success of the home visit program is to be measured.

(c) The Office of Child Abuse Prevention shall evaluate implementation plans and award implementation grants to selected voluntary home visit programs. In order to ensure that implementation proposals reflect the prevention and early intervention focus of home visits, the Office of Child Abuse Prevention shall develop proposed criteria for awarding implementation grants in accordance with each plan’s addressing of those elements set forth in subdivision (b).

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 329, Sec. 41.   Effective August 21, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

18994.5.

County programs are eligible for continued funding following an implementation assessment if both of the following are true:

(a) The assessment results in a determination that the county program has been implemented in accordance with the plan, and that the county program has established mechanisms to continue high-quality program operation.

(b) County administrators agree in writing that continued funding is contingent on the program continuing to produce high-quality results.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 329, Sec. 41.   Effective August 21, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

18994.55.

A grant for operation of a program under this chapter may be awarded to a county that has demonstrated readiness to begin operation of a program or to expand an existing support services program. A grant to operate a program under this chapter shall supplement, and not supplant, existing services and funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 329, Sec. 41.   Effective August 21, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

18994.6.

A planning grant may be awarded under this chapter to a county that has demonstrated a need to implement a program, but which is not ready to implement the program, or that is in need of additional planning to expand existing support services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 329, Sec. 41.   Effective August 21, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

18994.61.

Each grantee shall be required to provide matching funds with one dollar ($1) for every two dollars ($2) awarded. The match may be either in cash or through in-kind services or resources with comparable value.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 329, Sec. 41.   Effective August 21, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

18994.65.

(a) Research and program evaluation shall provide information for the development and implementation of this chapter. The Office of Child Abuse Prevention shall incorporate new research and program evaluation information in order to improve program quality and effectiveness as this information becomes available pursuant to this chapter.

(b) Research and program evaluation shall provide information for the development and implementation of this chapter. The Office of Child Abuse Prevention shall incorporate new research and program evaluation information to improve program quality and effectiveness as this information becomes available pursuant to the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 329, Sec. 41.   Effective August 21, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

18994.7.

The Office of Child Abuse Prevention shall provide administrative oversight for the California Families and Children Home Visit Program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 329, Sec. 41.   Effective August 21, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

18994.72.

(a) Of the funds appropriated in the Budget Act of 1998 for purposes of this chapter, not less than one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) shall be used for research and program evaluation. The Office of Child Abuse Prevention shall maximize its research capacity by using these funds to match foundation or university research and program evaluation grants.

(b) The department shall be responsible for performing an evaluation of the programs under this chapter. In conjunction with participating research entities, the department shall develop a research design methodology that describes data collection, data validation, and research techniques to be used in conducting the program evaluation, and the extent to which related evaluation research will be incorporated. Focus areas to measure whether outcomes for families and children are improved may relate to all or some of the following:

(1) Child well-being.

(2) Child protective services.

(3) Foster care.

(4) Family preservation and self-sufficiency.

(5) Parental or child involvement in the justice system.

(6) School achievement.

(7) Substance abuse.

(8) Parental employment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 329, Sec. 41.   Effective August 21, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

18994.74.

Of the funds appropriated for purposes of this chapter, not more than 7.5 percent shall be used for state support staff to facilitate the Office of Child Abuse Prevention’s ability to manage this program, provide for program evaluation oversight, and manage the activities of the task force created pursuant to Section 18994.9.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 329, Sec. 41.   Effective August 21, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

18994.8.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the State Department of Social Services, in consultation with other relevant state officials, seek and use any federal funds that may be available for the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 329, Sec. 41.   Effective August 21, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

18994.9.

(a) There is hereby established the California Families and Children Home Visit Program Task Force, which shall be convened by the Office of Child Abuse Prevention.

(b) The membership of the task force shall include, but need not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) The head of the Office of Child Abuse Prevention or his or her designee.

(2) The directors, or designees, of all of the following:

(A) The State Department of Social Services.

(B) The State
 Department of Public Health.

(C) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Justice.

(D) The State Department of Education.

(E) The California Emergency Management Agency.

(3) At least two county administrators from counties participating in this program, to be appointed by the director, with the consent of the county.

(4) The manager of this program from the Office of Child
 Abuse Prevention.

(5) Two legislative representatives, who shall be members of policy committees with jurisdiction over social services issues pertaining to children, with at least one each to be appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly and the Senate Committee on Rules.

(c) The task force shall do both of the following:

(1) Identify permanent funding sources from federal and state programs. Sources from which funding may be integrated for purposes of this chapter may include, but are not limited to, Medi-Cal Targeted Case Management and Administrative Program funds, provided for pursuant to Sections 14132.44 and 14132.47, family preservation funds, private health care providers, including health maintenance organizations and nonprofit hospitals, the California Special Supplemental Food Program for Women, Infants and
 Children, federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act funds, and Healthy Families Program funds.

(2) Develop recommendations for permanent funding for this chapter, in order that eligible families who choose to participate have access to the program.

(d) Each member of the task force shall serve without compensation, but shall be reimbursed, by his or her employing agency, for actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of his or her duties.

(e) The task force shall be supported by a reasonable amount of staff time, which shall be provided by the agencies represented on the task force, to the extent feasible within an agency’s existing resources. The task force may request data from, and may utilize the technical expertise of, other state agencies.

(f) The task force, under the guidance of the Office of Child Abuse Prevention, shall submit its report to the Legislature not later than November 1, 1999.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 252.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 14.5. The CalFood Program [18995. - 18995.]

18995.

(a) The State Emergency Food Assistance Program, which is administered by the State Department of Social Services, shall be renamed as the “CalFood Program.” The CalFood Program shall provide food and funding for the provision of emergency food to food banks established pursuant to the federal Emergency Food Assistance Program (7 C.F.R. Parts 250 and 251) whose ongoing primary function is to facilitate the distribution of food to low-income households.

(b) (1) The CalFood Account is hereby established in the Emergency Food for Families Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund established pursuant to Section 18852 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, and may receive federal funds and voluntary donations or contributions.

(2) Notwithstanding Section 18853 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, the following shall apply:

(A) (i) All moneys received by the CalFood Account shall, upon appropriation by the Legislature, be allocated to the State Department of Social Services for allocation to the CalFood Program and, excluding those contributions made pursuant to Section 18851 of the Revenue and Taxation Code and funds received through Parts 250 and 251 of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations, shall be used for the purchase, storage, and transportation of food grown or produced in California.

(ii) The percentage of storage and transportation expenditures compared to the CalFood Program fund’s annual budget may be increased from their levels in the 2021–22 fiscal year after a determination by the department in consultation with food bank stakeholders to reflect the true costs to acquire, store, and distribute foods purchased through the CalFood Program. The department shall report to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee on any changes to the rate and the supporting methodology.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), funds received by the CalFood Account shall, upon appropriation by the Legislature, be allocated to the State Department of Social Services for allocation to the CalFood Program as described in subparagraph (A), and shall, in part, be used to pay for the department’s administrative costs associated with the administration of the
 CalFood Program.

(c) (1) The Public Higher Education Pantry Assistance Program Account is hereby established in the Emergency Food for Families Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund established pursuant to Section 18852 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(2) Notwithstanding Section 18853 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, funds in the Public Higher Education Pantry Assistance Program Account shall, upon appropriation by the Legislature, be allocated to the State Department of Social Services for allocation to food banks established pursuant to Parts 250 and 251 of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations that meet both of the following criteria:

(A) The primary function of the food bank is the distribution of food to low-income households.

(B) The food bank has identified specific costs associated with supporting on-campus pantry and hunger relief efforts serving low-income students.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 50, Sec. 88.   (SB 187)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 14.6. State Emergency Food Bank Reserve Program [18995.1. - 18995.1.]

18995.1.

(a) (1) Subject to an appropriation for this purpose, the State Department of Social Services shall administer the State Emergency Food Bank Reserve Program to provide food, children’s diapers, wipes, and funding for the provision of emergency food, children’s diapers, wipes, and related costs to food banks serving low-income Californians to prevent hunger during natural or human-made disasters.

(2) For purposes of this chapter, “food banks” means participating providers operating in California under the federal Emergency Food Assistance Program (Parts 250 and 251 of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations), or the federal Commodity Supplemental Food
 Program (Parts 247 and 250 of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations), members of the nonprofit organization Feeding America that are based in California, and members of the California Association of Food Banks.

(b) Upon a proclamation or declaration of a disaster or state of emergency by the governing body of a county, city, or city and county, or by an official designated by ordinance adopted by that governing body, the state, or the federal government, the department may distribute funds for the purposes set forth in
 subdivision (c). The department shall determine the best method for distribution to ensure that the funds are used for the purposes specified in this chapter.

(c) Funds distributed pursuant to this chapter may be used for all of the following purposes:

(1) To purchase and distribute food in eligible communities.

(2) To reimburse food banks for food and the costs associated with the procurement and distribution of food in eligible communities.

(3) To purchase and distribute children’s diapers and wipes in eligible communities.

(4) To reimburse food banks for children’s diapers and
 wipes and the costs associated with the procurement and distribution of children’s diapers and wipes in eligible communities.

(d) Notwithstanding any other law, agreements awarded pursuant to this section shall be exempt from the requirements of Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the Public Contract Code, and the State Contracting Manual, and shall not be subject to the approval of the Department of General Services.

(e) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the State Department of Social Services may implement, interpret, or make specific this chapter by means
 of letter or similar instructions without taking any regulatory action.

(f) The Legislature finds and declares that this chapter is a state law that provides assistance and services for undocumented persons within the meaning of Section 1621(d) of Title 8 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 596, Sec. 2.   (AB 798)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 15. Emergency Food Assistance Program Advisory Board [18996. - 18996.]

18996.

(a) The Emergency Food Assistance Program Advisory Board is hereby established. The board shall provide advice and assistance in the operation of the emergency food assistance program (EFAP). The board shall also provide advice on all matters relating to food distribution. The board shall annually review the state plan and any amendments submitted to the United States Department of Agriculture by the state, as well as the EFAP budget and review the EFAP annual report. The plan shall include equitable criteria for eligibility and the distribution of commodities and administrative funds.

(b) The board shall consist of 22 members, 12 to be appointed by the Governor, five to be appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules, and five to be appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly. Appointments shall reflect geographic diversity statewide, and shall include food bank and congregate feeding program representatives and people interested in the emergency food assistance program.

(c) The board shall be subject to the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 329, Sec. 42.   Effective August 21, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 16. California Guaranteed Income Pilot Program [18997. - 18997.4.]

18997.

(a) Subject to an appropriation for this purpose in the annual Budget Act, the State Department of Social Services shall administer the California Guaranteed Income Pilot Program to provide grants to eligible entities for the purpose of administering pilot programs and projects that provide a guaranteed income to participants. The department shall prioritize funding for pilot programs and projects that serve California residents who age out of the extended foster care program at or after 21 years of age or who are pregnant individuals. The department, in consultation with relevant stakeholders, shall determine the methodology for, and manner of, distributing grants awarded pursuant to this chapter. In determining the methodology and manner of distributing grants, the department shall ensure that grant funds are awarded in an
 equitable manner to eligible entities in both rural and urban counties and in proportion to the number of individuals anticipated to be served by an eligible entity’s pilot program or project.

(b) In order to receive grant funds pursuant to this chapter, an eligible entity shall do all of the following:

(1) Present commitments of additional funding for pilot programs and projects to be funded with a grant received pursuant to this chapter equal to or greater than 50 percent of the amount of funding to be provided to the pilot program or project from a grant received pursuant to this chapter.

(2) Present a plan for providing all individuals who receive guaranteed income payments funded with a grant provided under this chapter with sufficient benefits counseling and informational materials to ensure that they are aware
 of any impact the receipt of a guaranteed income payment from the pilot program or project may have on their eligibility for other public benefit programs.

(3) Agree to assist the department in obtaining, or to pursue, to the extent necessary, all available exemptions or waivers to ensure that guaranteed income payments made under those pilots and projects are not considered income or resources for the recipient of the guaranteed income payments or any member of their household in any means-tested federal, state, or local public benefit programs.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, guaranteed income payments received by an individual from a pilot program or project funded pursuant to this chapter shall not be considered income or resources for purposes of determining the individual’s, or any member of their household’s, eligibility
 for benefits or assistance, or the amount or extent of benefits or assistance, under any state or local benefit or assistance program.

(2) The department shall, in consultation with stakeholders, and after consultation with the Legislature, identify federal benefit and assistance programs that require an exemption or waiver in order for a guaranteed income payment funded with a grant provided under this chapter to be excluded from consideration as income or resources for purposes of the federal program. Notwithstanding any other law, a state department or agency that administers a program identified by the department shall, if possible, approve an exemption or waiver, or provide any other authority deemed necessary by the department, to exclude guaranteed income payments from consideration as income or resources for purposes of the federal program, or, if the state department or agency does not have that authority, seek a federal waiver or
 exemption. The state’s failure to be granted a federal exemption or waiver, as described in this paragraph, shall not affect the department’s ability to administer the California Guaranteed Income Pilot Program, and the department may consider alternatives to prevent adverse consequences for participants, in consultation with the Legislature and stakeholders.

(d) Notwithstanding any other law, for the purposes of determining eligibility to receive benefits, or the amount or extent of medical assistance, under the Medi-Cal program, a guaranteed income payment funded with a grant provided under this chapter shall not be considered income or resources for a period of 12 months from receipt. This subdivision shall only be implemented by the State Department of Health Care Services to the extent consistent with federal law and any waivers received for the implementation of this subdivision, and federal financial participation for the Medi-Cal
 program is available and not otherwise jeopardized.

(e) (1) The department shall review and evaluate the pilot programs and projects funded pursuant to this chapter to determine, at a minimum, the economic impact of the programs and projects and their impact on the outcomes of individuals who receive guaranteed income payments funded with a grant provided under this chapter. To the extent feasible within existing resources and evaluation design, the evaluation shall include the applicability of the lessons learned from the pilot program for the state’s CalWORKs program, with the objective of reaching the goals of improved outcomes for families and children living in poverty. The department shall consult with stakeholders and legislative staff on the details of, and data components to include in, the evaluation, as well as any other topics to be addressed by the review and evaluation, in advance of any decision to contract
 for this evaluation. Notwithstanding any other law, the department may accept and, subject to an appropriation for this purpose, expend funds from any source, public or private, for the review and evaluation.

(2) (A) The department shall submit a report to the Legislature regarding the review and evaluation conducted pursuant to paragraph (1) and shall post a copy of the report on its internet website. The department shall comply with this subparagraph by no later than June 1, 2028.

(B) The report described in subparagraph (A) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(f) Upon allocation of funding to eligible entities, as described in this section, the
 department shall report to the Legislature, and post publicly on its internet website, information about the grants funded, including which specific eligible entities received grants, the expected number of foster youth receiving guaranteed income payments funded with a grant provided under this chapter, characteristics about, and the number of, other populations receiving guaranteed income payments funded with a grant provided under this chapter, and the length of time each guaranteed income pilot program or project will be administered.

(g) For the purposes of this section, “eligible entity” means either of the following:

(1) A city, county, city and county, tribe, consortium of tribes, or tribal organization, or any combination thereof.

(2) A nonprofit organization that is exempt from federal income taxation under
 Section 501(c)(3) or 501(c)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and that provides a letter of support for its pilot or project from any county or city and county in which the organization will operate its pilot or project.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 26, Sec. 36.   (AB 152)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Inoperative January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 18997.4.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 18997.4.)
-------------------------------------------

18997.1.

Notwithstanding any other law:

(a) Contracts or grants awarded pursuant to this chapter shall be exempt from the personal services contracting requirements of Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(b) Contracts or grants awarded pursuant to this chapter shall be exempt from the Public Contract Code and the State Contracting Manual, and shall not be subject to the approval of the Department of General Services.

(c) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3
 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this chapter without taking any regulatory action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 86, Sec. 56.   (AB 153)   Effective July 16, 2021.   Inoperative January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 18997.4.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 18997.4.)
-------------------------------------------

18997.2.

(a) The department may establish an appropriate method, process, and structure for grant management, fiscal accountability, payments to guaranteed income pilot participants, and technical assistance and supports for grantees that ensure transparency and accountability in the use of state funds. The department may, at its discretion, contract with one or more entities, including, but not limited to, community development financial intermediaries, state financial entities, or community-based organizations, for these purposes.

(b) The department may, at its discretion, contract with a third-party vendor for the purpose of developing a benefits counseling tool or informational materials for use by grantees to assist in meeting the requirements
 of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 18997.

(c) The department may, at its discretion, require grantees to use a specified third-party vendor for purposes of administering grantees’ pilots and to meet the requirements of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 50, Sec. 89.   (SB 187)   Effective June 30, 2022.   Inoperative January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 18997.4.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 18997.4.)
-------------------------------------------

18997.3.

Notwithstanding any other law, the department may accept and, subject to an appropriation for this purpose, expend funds from any source, public or private, to administer this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 43, Sec. 88.   (AB 120)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Inoperative January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 18997.4.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 18997.4.)
-------------------------------------------

18997.4.

This chapter shall become inoperative on January 1, 2029, and, as of January 1, 2030, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 26, Sec. 37.   (AB 152)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.    Note: Repeal affects Chapter 16, commencing with Section 18997.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 16.1. The California Hope, Opportunity, Perseverance, and Empowerment (HOPE) for Children Trust Account Act [18997.5. - 18997.61.]

18997.5.

(a) This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the California Hope, Opportunity, Perseverance, and Empowerment (HOPE) for Children Trust Account Act.

(b) The California Hope, Opportunity, Perseverance, and Empowerment (HOPE) for Children Trust Account Program is hereby established for the purpose of providing an eligible child with a trust account pursuant to this chapter.
